Utah statutes.
39-7-108.   Stay of execution of judgment.
Unless the court determines on the record that the ability of the service
member to comply with the judgment or order entered or sought is not
materially affected by reason of his military service, the court may, on its
own motion, or upon application to it by the service member or another person
on his behalf:
(1)  stay the execution of any judgment or order entered against the service
member, as provided in this chapter; and
(2)  vacate or stay any attachment or garnishment of property, money, or debts
in the hands of another, whether before or after judgment as provided in this
chapter.
